Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.240

Breakfast after the bell program—Analysis.

(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct an analysis of breakfast after the bell programs established in schools in accordance with RCW 28A.235.210. The analysis of the schools establishing breakfast after the bell programs shall include a review of any changes in student:

(a) Tardiness and absenteeism;

(b) Suspensions;

(c) Reported illnesses and visits to nurses' offices;

(d) Results on standardized tests; and

(e) Graduation rates.

(2) The analysis shall also include a review of the outcomes of similar programs or efforts in other states.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the education and research data center of the office of financial management shall assist in providing any data required to conduct the analysis. The analysis, including any findings and recommendations, must be completed and submitted to the superintendent of public instruction and, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2026.

[ 2018 c 8 s 9.]

NOTES:

Short title—2018 c 8: See note following RCW 28A.235.210.